District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.12

Exceptions to coverage of subchapter; expiration provisions.

Sections 42-3404.02 , 42-3404.04 , 42-3404.05 , 42-3404.06 , 42-3404.07 , 42-3404.09(3) and (4), 42-3404.10(3) and (4) and 42-3404.11(3) and (4) apply to any sale of a housing accommodation for which a contract is not fully ratified prior to June 3, 1980, and the period for contracting pursuant to § 601 or § 602 of the Rental Housing Act is not expired prior to the effective date of this subchapter. This subchapter applies in its entirety to any sale of a housing accommodation for which a notice pursuant to § 601 or § 602 of the Rental Housing Act is not received by the tenants in at least 50% of the occupied rental units in the housing accommodation prior to June 3, 1980. This subchapter shall remain in effect until the Mayor declares that a housing crisis no longer exists pursuant to § 42-3405.12. This subchapter does not apply to accommodations for which a vacancy exemption is approved, as provided in § 42-3402.10.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 412, 27 DCR 2975
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-106, § 3(b), 27 DCR 3758
Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-131, § 801(e), 28 DCR 326
Nov. 5, 1983, D.C. Law 5-38, § 2(l), 30 DCR 4866
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-154, § 2(i), 35 DCR 5715
Sept. 6, 1995, D.C. Law 11-31, § 3(o), 42 DCR 3239
1981 Ed., § 45-1641.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1988 (D.C. Law 7-140, September 21, 2008, law notification 35 DCR 7279).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-13, September 11, 1993, law notification 40 DCR 6835).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Temporary Extension Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-176, September 22, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6706).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-235, April 28, 1994, 41 DCR 2599).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(o) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-285, July 8, 1994, 41 DCR 4904).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(o) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-47, May 4, 1995, 42 DCR 2410) and § 3(596) of the Rental Housing Conversion and Sale Act of 1980 Reenactment and Amendment Congressional Recess Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-96, July 19, 1995, 42 DCR 3837).
The “Rental Housing Act”, referred to in the second sentence, is the Rental Housing Act of 1977, D.C. Law 2-54, which had formerly been codified as Chapter 16 of this title, and which was subsequently superseded by the Rental Housing Act of 1980, D.C. Law 3-131. See also § 42-3401.03(15).

Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.

Amendment of section by Law 10-144: Section 2(o) of D.C. Law 10-144 purported to amend this section to read as follows: “ Sections 45-1631, 45-1633, 45-1634, 45-1635, 45-1636, 45-1638 (3) and (4), 45-1639 (3) and (4) and 45-1640 (3) and (4) apply to any sale of a housing accommodation for which a contract is not fully ratified prior to June 3, 1980, and the period for contracting pursuant to § 601 or § 602 of the Rental Housing Act is not expired prior to the effective date of this subchapter. This subchapter applies in its entirety to any sale of a housing accommodation for which a notice pursuant to § 601 or § 602 of the Rental Housing Act is not received by the tenants in at least 50% of the occupied rental units in the housing accommodation prior to June 3, 1980. This subchapter shall remain in effect until the Mayor declares that a housing crisis no longer exists pursuant to § 45-1662 [§ 42-3405.12, 2001 Ed.]. This subchapter does not apply to accommodations for which a vacancy exemption is approved, as provided in § 45-1639 [§ 42-3404.10, 2001 Ed.].”